Utah statutes.
32A-12-506 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Carriers' records.

(1)  All motor carriers and other persons transporting alcoholic products into or within this state  shall keep books in which is entered, immediately on the receipt of any products, the name of every person to whom the products are consigned, the amount and kind received, and the date when delivered.  The consignee shall sign the consignee's name, or in the case of a partnership or corporation, an agent authorized in writing, shall sign their name in the books.

(2)  The books shall be open to inspection by any authorized official of the state or local authority at any time during business hours of the motor carrier.  The books constitute prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the books and are admissible as evidence in any court proceeding to enforce this title.

